Utah, session 2026, HB530.
Section 1. Section 63N-22-101 is enacted to read:22. Permitting Coordination1. General Provisions63N-22-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Permit" means written authorization to engage in an activity that is regulated under state law.(2)"Permitting agency" means a state department, division, office, or agency that issues, administers, or enforces a permit.(3)"Permitting coordinator" means the individual appointed by the executive director under Section 63N-22-201.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63N-22-201 is enacted to read:2. Permitting Coordinator63N-22-201. Permitting coordinator created -- Appointment -- Status.(1)There is created within the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity the position of permitting coordinator.(2)The executive director shall appoint the permitting coordinator after consulting with one or more permitting agencies that the executive director determines are relevant to the duties of the permitting coordinator under Section 63N-22-202.(3)The permitting coordinator:(a)serves at the pleasure of the executive director; and(b)shall report to the executive director or the executive director's designee.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 63N-22-202 is enacted to read:63N-22-202. Duties of permitting coordinator.(1)With respect to projects, activities, or undertakings that require one or more permits from one or more permitting agencies, the permitting coordinator shall:(a)assist individuals and entities seeking one or more permits by identifying applicable state permitting requirements and the permitting agencies that may have authority over a proposed activity that requires a permit;(b)serve as a central source of information for state permitting requirements and procedures and for permitting agency points of contact for federal officers, federal agencies, persons seeking permits, and other interested parties;(c)develop and make available guidance materials to assist persons seeking permits in navigating state permitting requirements and application processes;(d)coordinate among permitting agencies to promote clarity, transparency, and efficient administration of permit review and timely permit decisions;(e)in coordination with the governor's office:(i)engage with tribal governments on matters relating to permits; and(ii)serve as a point of contact and liaison for the state with federal agencies on matters involving state and federal permits, including the federal Permitting Steering Council created in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 4370m et seq.;(f)identify opportunities to improve coordination between state permitting agencies and federal agencies for projects requiring both state and federal permits; and(g)in conjunction with permitting agencies, identify:(i)administrative or procedural improvements within existing permitting requirements that may improve the administration of permit review and permit issuance and, upon request, assist permitting agencies with implementation of those improvements; and(ii)potential legislative changes relating to permitting requirements that may improve the timeliness, predictability, or efficiency of state permit review and permit issuance.(2)In carrying out the duties described in Subsection (1), the permitting coordinator shall act in coordination with the executive director and applicable permitting agencies.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63N-22-203 is enacted to read:63N-22-203. Limitation on authority.(1)The permitting coordinator may not issue, deny, condition, or modify a permit.(2)Nothing in this chapter:(a)alters the jurisdiction or authority of a permitting agency;(b)creates a right to expedited or preferential review by a permitting agency of a permit application or permit request; or(c)creates a presumption that a permitting agency is required to issue or approve a permit.(3)The duties of the permitting coordinator do not include assisting with a permit that is primarily ministerial in nature or that relates to personal licensure, registration, or identification.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 63N-22-204 is enacted to read:63N-22-204. Coordination with other governmental entities.(1)To carry out the duties described in this chapter, the executive director or the permitting coordinator, as authorized by the executive director, may participate in coordination, consultation, or information-sharing efforts with state, federal, tribal, or local governmental entities concerning permitting requirements.(2)Participation under this chapter does not obligate the state or a permitting agency to approve a permit, modify a permitting requirement or procedure, or enter into a binding agreement unless otherwise expressly authorized by law.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 63N-22-205 is enacted to read:63N-22-205. Annual report.(1)The executive director shall include, in the annual report described in Section 63N-1a-306, a report regarding the activities of the permitting coordinator.(2)The report described in Subsection (1) shall include:(a)a description of the assistance, coordination, or outreach activities performed under this chapter;(b)identification of recurring procedural or administrative challenges associated with state permitting requirements, as observed through the permitting coordinator's activities; and(c)recommendations, if any, for any administrative or legislative changes described in Subsection 63N-22-202(1)(g).

Section 7:
Section 7.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.